Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.011

4-H license plates.

"4-H license plates" means special license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display the "4-H" logo.

[ 2012 c 65 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 65: See note following RCW 46.18.200.